Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 30
INCOME TAX

Sec.

63-3029Q — 63-3029DD. [Reserved.]

§ 63-3001. Title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Income Tax Act.”

§ 63-3002. Declaration of intent.

It is the intent of the legislature by the adoption of this act, insofar as possible to make the provisions of the Idaho act identical to the provisions of the Federal Internal Revenue Code relating to the measurement of taxable income, to the end that the taxable income reported each taxable year by a taxpayer to the internal revenue service shall be the identical sum reported to this state, subject only to modifications contained in the Idaho law; to achieve this result by the application of the various provisions of the Federal Internal Revenue Code relating to the definition of income, exceptions therefrom, deductions (personal and otherwise), accounting methods, taxation of trusts, estates, partnerships and corporations, basis and other pertinent provisions to gross income as defined therein, resulting in an amount called “taxable income” in the Internal Revenue Code, and then to impose the provisions of this act thereon to derive a sum called “Idaho taxable income”; to impose a tax on residents of this state measured by Idaho taxable income wherever derived and on the Idaho taxable income of nonresidents which is the result of activity within or derived from sources within this state. All of the foregoing is subject to modifications in Idaho law including, without limitation, modifications applicable to unitary groups of corporations, which include corporations incorporated outside the United States.

§ 63-3003. Definitions.

When used in this act, the terms defined in this chapter shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them.

§ 63-3004. Internal Revenue Code.

The term “Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and in effect on the first day of January 2020.

For all purposes of the Idaho income tax act, a marriage must be one that is considered valid or recognized under section 28, article III, of the constitution of the state of Idaho and defined in section 32-201, Idaho Code, or as recognized under section 32-209, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, marriages recognized and permitted by the United States supreme court and the ninth circuit court of appeals shall also be recognized for purposes of the Idaho income tax act.

§ 63-3005. Person.

The term “person” means an individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, an association, a limited liability company or a corporation.

§ 63-3006. Corporation.

The term “corporation” includes any corporation formed under the laws of any government, any common law trust and any association of whatever kind other than a partnership. “Corporation” also includes any entity classified or taxed as a corporation pursuant to section 7701 or 7704 of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations of the U.S. department of the treasury issued thereunder.

§ 63-3006A. Limited liability company — Classification and taxation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 63-3006, Idaho Code, for the purposes of chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, a limited liability company as defined in subsection (5) or (6) of section 53-601, Idaho Code, or as defined in section 30-6-102, Idaho Code, as appropriate pursuant to section 30-6-1104, Idaho Code, shall be classified as a partnership, corporation, unincorporated association or otherwise pursuant to the provisions of the internal revenue code. A limited liability company that is classified as a partnership pursuant to the internal revenue code shall be treated as a partnership for purposes of chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code. A limited liability company that is classified other than a partnership pursuant to the internal revenue code shall be treated for purposes of chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, in accordance with its classification.

§ 63-3006B. Partnership.

“Partnership” shall be as defined in section 7701 of the Internal Revenue Code and shall include any entity classified as a partnership pursuant to regulations of the U.S. department of the treasury issued under section 7701 of the Internal Revenue Code, but shall not include a publicly traded partnership taxed as a corporation under section 63-3006, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3006C. Pass-through entity.

The term “pass-through entity” as used in this chapter includes a partnership, as defined in section 63-3006B, Idaho Code, a limited liability company taxed as a partnership under section 63-3006A, Idaho Code, an S corporation required to file a return under section 63-3030(4), Idaho Code, or a trust or estate required to file a return under section 63-3030, Idaho Code. An “owner of an interest in a pass-through entity” includes the shareholders of a corporation, the members of a limited liability company and partners of a partnership.

§ 63-3007. Fiduciary.

The term “fiduciary” means a guardian, trustee, executor, administrator, receiver, conservator, or any person acting in a position of trust or fiduciary capacity for any other person or group of persons.

§ 63-3008. Individual.

The term “individual” means a natural person.

§ 63-3009. Taxpayer.

The term “taxpayer” means any person subject to a tax imposed by this act or required by the provisions of this act to file an income tax return, report income or pay a tax.

§ 63-3010. Taxable year.

The term “taxable year” with respect to any taxpayer means:

The taxable year of such taxpayer required pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code; or

Such other period as may be required by law; or

The calendar year.

§ 63-3011. Gross income.

The term “gross income” means gross income as defined in section 61(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

§ 63-3011A. Adjusted gross income.

The term “adjusted gross income” means adjusted gross income as defined in section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code.

§ 63-3011B. Taxable income.

The term “taxable income” means federal taxable income as determined under the Internal Revenue Code.

§ 63-3011C. Idaho taxable income.

The term “Idaho taxable income” means taxable income as modified pursuant to the Idaho adjustments specifically provided in this chapter.

§ 63-3012. Includes and including.

The terms “includes” and “including” when used in a definition contained in this act shall not be deemed to exclude other things otherwise within the meaning of the term defined.

§ 63-3013. Resident.

The term “resident,” for income tax purposes, means any individual who:

Is domiciled in the state of Idaho for the entire taxable year; or

Maintains a place of abode in this state for the entire taxable year and spends in the aggregate more than two hundred seventy (270) days of the taxable year in this state. Presence within the state for any part of a calendar day shall constitute a day spent in the state unless the individual can show that his presence in the state for that day was for a temporary or transitory purpose.

An individual shall not be considered a resident, but may be considered a part-year resident, during a period of absence from this state described as follows:

The period begins with an individual leaving this state if the individual is absent from this state for at least four hundred forty-five (445) days in the first fifteen (15) months.

During such period, but excluding the first fifteen (15) months, the individual was not present in this state for more than sixty (60) days in any calendar year.

During such period, the individual did not maintain a permanent place of abode in this state at which his spouse (unless he and his spouse are legally separated) or minor or dependent children are present for more than sixty (60) days during any calendar year.

The individual did not, during such period, hold an elective or appointive office of the government of the United States (other than the armed forces of the United States or career appointees in the United States foreign service).

The individual was not, during such period, employed on the staff of an elective officer in the legislative branch of the government of the United States; and

The individual did not, during such period, claim Idaho as his tax home for federal income tax purposes.

The period ends with an individual returning to this state if such individual remains or resides in the state for more than sixty (60) days.

Any individual who is a nonresident alien as defined in section 7701 of the Internal Revenue Code is not a resident within the meaning of this section.

§ 63-3013A. Part-year resident.

The term “part-year resident,” for income tax purposes, means any individual who is not a resident and who:

Has changed his domicile from Idaho or to Idaho during the taxable year; or

Has resided in Idaho for more than one (1) day during the taxable year. An individual shall be deemed to reside within Idaho for any calendar day in which that individual has a place of abode in this state and is present in this state for more than a temporary or transitory purpose. Presence for any fraction of a calendar day shall be counted as a whole day.

§ 63-3014. Nonresident.

The term “nonresident” means any individual who is not a resident or part-year resident.

§ 63-3015. Estates and trusts.

An estate is treated as a resident estate if the decedent was a resident of Idaho on the date of death.

A trust, other than a qualified funeral trust, is treated as a resident trust if three (3) or more of the following conditions existed for the entire taxable year:

The domicile or residency of the grantor is in Idaho;

The trust is governed by Idaho law;

The trust has real or tangible personal property located in Idaho;

The domicile or residency of the trustee is in Idaho;

The administration of the trust takes place in Idaho. Administration of the trust includes conducting trust business, investing trust assets, making administrative decisions, recordkeeping and preparation and filing of tax returns.

A trust, other than a qualified funeral trust, is treated as a part-year resident trust each day of the taxable year during which three (3) or more of the conditions specified in subsection (2) of this section existed.

A qualified funeral trust is treated as a resident trust if its trustee has elected treatment as a qualified funeral trust pursuant to section 685 of the Internal Revenue Code where, at the time of the initial funding of the trust, the trust is required to be established under the laws of this state or, in the absence of such a requirement, where a funeral home or cemetery located in this state is identified to provide the services or merchandise, or both, under the terms of a preneed contract requiring the establishment of the trust.

Qualified funeral trusts having a single trustee may file a single, composite return pursuant to rules of the state tax commission. Each beneficiary’s interest in a qualified funeral trust included in the composite return under this section shall be taxed as a separate trust for the purposes of application of the rate schedules in section 63-3024, Idaho Code, and determination of the filing requirement in section 63-3030, Idaho Code. The composite return shall not be a return of a person under section 63-3082, Idaho Code.

If the estate does not qualify as a resident estate, it is treated as a nonresident estate.

If the trust does not qualify as a resident or part-year resident trust, it is treated as a nonresident trust.

For purposes of determining residency status of a trust, no distinction is made between inter vivos trusts and testamentary trusts or between revocable trusts and irrevocable trusts.

§ 63-3016. Paid or incurred and paid or accrued.

The terms “paid or incurred” and “paid or accrued” shall be defined as set forth in the Internal Revenue Code and shall be construed according to the method of accounting upon the basis of which the taxable income is computed.

§ 63-3017. Employer.

The term “employer” means “employer” as defined in the Internal Revenue Code.

§ 63-3018. Employee.

The term “employee” means “employee” as defined in the Internal Revenue Code.

§ 63-3019. Wages. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3020. Farmer.

The term “farmer” means any person over two-thirds (2/3) of whose gross income is derived from farming.

§ 63-3021. Net operating loss.

The term “net operating loss” means the amount by which Idaho taxable income, after making the modifications specified in subsection (b) of this section, is less than zero (0).

Add the following amounts:

The amount of any net operating loss deduction included in Idaho taxable income.

In the case of a taxpayer other than a corporation:

Any amount deducted due to losses in excess of gains from sales or exchanges of capital assets; and

Any deduction for long-term capital gains provided by this chapter.

Any deduction allowed under section 151 of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to personal exemption) or any deduction in lieu of any such deduction.

Any deduction for the standard or itemized deductions provided for in section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code, or section 63-3022(j), Idaho Code, except for any deduction allowable under section 165(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to casualty losses) pertaining to property physically located inside Idaho at the time of the casualty.

Any deduction allowed under section 199A of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to the deduction for qualified business income).

Subject to the provisions of sections 381 and 382, Internal Revenue Code, Idaho net operating losses incurred by a corporation will survive a merger.

Changes in the location of a loss corporation’s business or its key employees shall not be treated as a failure to satisfy the continuity of business requirements.

If the premerger corporation conducted operations in Idaho and at least one (1) other state, the section 382, Internal Revenue Code, loss limitation is limited further by the premerger loss corporation’s Idaho apportionment factor for the last taxable year preceding the date of the merger.

§ 63-3021A. Calculation of net operating loss when taxable income is determined by excess inclusion income.

When, pursuant to section 63-3011B, Idaho Code, taxable income for any tax year is determined by the amount of excess inclusion income taxable as determined by Internal Revenue Code section 860E, and when the taxpayer would incur a net operating loss or would be entitled to carry forward a net operating loss pursuant to section 63-3022, Idaho Code, except for the effect of the excess inclusion income reported for that tax year, the net operating loss incurred in that tax year or carried forward from an earlier tax year may be taken as deductions in other tax years, subject to the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of section 63-3022, Idaho Code. In computing the net operating loss that may be used in another tax year, the excess inclusion income recognized as taxable income shall be deducted from gross income or taxable income, as provided by treasury regulation 1.860E-1(a)(1).

§ 63-3022. Adjustments to taxable income.

The additions and subtractions set forth in this section, and in sections 63-3022A through 63-3022U, Idaho Code, are to be applied to the extent allowed in computing Idaho taxable income:

Add any state and local taxes, as defined in section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code that are measured by net income, or for which a credit is allowable under section 63-3029, Idaho Code, and paid or accrued during the taxable year adjusted for state or local tax refunds used in arriving at taxable income.

Add the net operating loss deduction used in arriving at taxable income.

A net operating loss for any taxable year commencing on and after January 1, 2000, but before January 1, 2013, shall be a net operating loss carryback not to exceed a total of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to the two (2) immediately preceding taxable years. At the election of the taxpayer, the two (2) year carryback may be forgone and the loss subtracted from income received in taxable years arising in the next twenty (20) years succeeding the taxable year in which the loss arises in order until exhausted.
(c)(1) A net operating loss for any taxable year commencing on and after January 1, 2000, but before January 1, 2013, shall be a net operating loss carryback not to exceed a total of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to the two (2) immediately preceding taxable years. At the election of the taxpayer, the two (2) year carryback may be forgone and the loss subtracted from income received in taxable years arising in the next twenty (20) years succeeding the taxable year in which the loss arises in order until exhausted.

A net operating loss for any taxable year commencing on or after January 1, 2013, shall be a net operating loss carryback not to exceed a total of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to the two (2) immediately preceding taxable years only if an amended return carrying the loss back is filed within one (1) year of the end of the taxable year of the net operating loss that results in such carryback.

Any portion of the net operating loss not subtracted from income in the two (2) preceding years may be subtracted from income in the next twenty (20) years succeeding the taxable year in which the loss arises in order until exhausted. The sum of the deductions may not exceed the amount of the net operating loss deduction incurred. The carryback shall be limited to a total of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the case of an individual filing as married filing separate in the year of the loss.

Net operating losses incurred by a corporation during a year in which such corporation did not transact business in Idaho or was not included in a group of corporations combined under subsection (t) of section 63-3027, Idaho Code, may not be subtracted. However, if at least one (1) corporation within a group of corporations combined under subsection (t) of section 63-3027, Idaho Code, was transacting business in Idaho during the taxable year in which the loss was incurred, then the net operating loss may be subtracted. Net operating losses incurred by a person, other than a corporation, in activities not taxable by Idaho may not be subtracted.

The term “income” as used in this subsection means Idaho taxable income as defined in this chapter as modified by section 63-3021(b)(2), (3) and (4), Idaho Code.

In the case of a corporation, add the amount deducted under the provisions of sections 243(a) and (c), 244, 245, and 246A of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to dividends received by corporations and other special deductions) as limited by section 246(b)(1) of said code.

In the case of a corporation, subtract an amount determined under section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code to be taxable as dividends.

Subtract the amount of any income received or accrued during the taxable year which is exempt from taxation by this state, under the provisions of any other law of this state or a law of the United States, if not previously subtracted in arriving at taxable income.
(g) For the purpose of determining the Idaho taxable income of the beneficiary of a trust or of an estate:

Distributable net income as defined for federal tax purposes shall be corrected for the other adjustments required by this section.

Net operating losses attributable to a beneficiary of a trust or estate under section 642 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be a deduction for the beneficiary to the extent that income from the trust or estate would be attributable to this state under the provisions of this chapter.

In the case of a corporation, including any corporation included in a group of corporations combined under subsection (t) of section 63-3027, Idaho Code, add any capital loss or passive loss deducted which loss was incurred during any year in which such corporation did not transact business in Idaho. However, do not add any capital loss deducted if a corporation, including any corporation in a group of corporations combined under subsection (t) of section 63-3027, Idaho Code, was transacting business in Idaho during the taxable year in which the loss was incurred. In the case of persons other than corporations, add any capital loss or passive loss deducted which was incurred in activities not taxable by Idaho at the time such loss was incurred. In computing the income taxable to an S corporation or partnership under this section, deduction shall not be allowed for a carryover or carryback of a net operating loss provided for in subsection (c) of this section, a passive loss or a capital loss provided for in section 1212 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(h) In the case of an individual who is on active duty as a full-time officer, enlistee or draftee, with the armed forces of the United States, which full-time duty is or will be continuous and uninterrupted for one hundred twenty (120) consecutive days or more, deduct compensation paid by the armed forces of the United States for services performed outside this state. The deduction is allowed only to the extent such income is included in taxable income.

(j) In the case of an individual, there shall be allowed as a deduction from gross income either paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection at the option of the taxpayer:

(1) The standard deduction as defined in section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Itemized deductions as defined in section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code except state or local taxes measured by net income and general sales taxes as either is defined in section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(k) Add the taxable amount of any lump sum distribution excluded from gross income for federal income tax purposes under the ten (10) year averaging method. The taxable amount will include the ordinary income portion and the amount eligible for the capital gain election.

(
l
) Deduct any amounts included in gross income under the provisions of section 86 of the Internal Revenue Code relating to certain social security and railroad benefits.

(m) In the case of a self-employed individual, deduct the actual cost of premiums paid to secure worker’s compensation insurance for coverage in Idaho, if such cost has not been deducted in arriving at taxable income.

(n) In the case of an individual for any tax period ending on or prior to December 31, 2016, deduct the amount contributed to a college savings program but not more than four thousand dollars ($4,000) per tax year. In the case of an individual and for any tax period starting on or after January 1, 2017, deduct the amount contributed to a college savings program, but not more than six thousand dollars ($6,000) per tax year. For those married and filing jointly, deduct the amount contributed to a college savings program, but not more than twice of that allowed for an individual. To be qualified for this deduction, the contribution must be made during the taxable year and made to an Idaho college savings program account as described in chapter 54, title 33, Idaho Code.

(o) In the case of an individual, add the amount of a nonqualified withdrawal from an individual trust account or savings account established pursuant to chapter 54, title 33, Idaho Code, less any amount of such nonqualified withdrawal included in the individual’s federal gross income pursuant to section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. The addition provided in this subsection is limited to contributions previously exempt from Idaho state income tax and earnings generated from the program as long as the earnings are not already included in federal adjusted gross income.

(p) In the case of an individual, add the amount of a withdrawal from an individual trust account or savings account established pursuant to chapter 54, title 33, Idaho Code, transferred to a qualified tuition program, as defined in section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, that is operated by a state other than Idaho or to a qualified ABLE program as defined in section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code. The addition provided in this subsection is limited to the amount of the contributions to the Idaho individual trust account or savings account by the account owner that was deducted on the account owner’s Idaho income tax return for the year of the transfer and the prior taxable year.

(q) Deduct any amount disallowed under section 461(
l
)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to excess business losses) that is treated as part of the taxpayer’s net operating loss carryforward for federal income tax purposes.

§ 63-3022A. Deduction of certain retirement benefits.

An amount specified by subsection (b) of this section of the following retirement benefits may be deducted by an individual from taxable income if such individual has either attained age sixty-five (65) years, or has attained age sixty-two (62) years and is classified as disabled:

Retirement annuities paid to a retired employee or the unmarried widow or widower of a retired employee by the United States of America under the:

Civil service retirement system; or

Foreign service retirement and disability system; or

Offset program of the civil service retirement system or foreign service retirement and disability system.

Retirement benefits paid from the firemen’s retirement fund of the state of Idaho to a retired fireman or the unremarried widow or widower of a retired fireman.

Retirement benefits paid to a retired Idaho city police officer:

By a city or its agent in regard to a policeman’s retirement fund that no longer admits new members and on January 1, 2012, was administered by a city in this state; or

In regard to a policeman’s retirement fund that no longer admits new members and on January 1, 2012, was administered by the public employee retirement system of Idaho; or

By the public employee retirement system of Idaho to a retired police officer in regard to Idaho employment not included in the federal social security retirement system; or

An unremarried widow or widower of a person described in subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii) of this paragraph.

Retirement benefits paid by the United States of America to a retired member of the military services of the United States or the unremarried widow or widower of such member.

The amount of retirement benefits that may be deducted from taxable income shall be an amount not in excess of maximum retirement benefits under the social security act, as amended, on the date on which this act is passed and approved, including adjustments to be made based upon consumer price index adjustments provided in section 215 of the social security act. The state tax commission shall ascertain benefit changes made in accordance with the social security act and publish the appropriate deduction amounts provided by this section reflecting such changes annually. Maximum retirement benefits under the social security act shall mean:

In the case of a taxpayer who files a joint return with his spouse for the tax year, an amount equal to the maximum social security benefits payable for the tax year to a person attaining full retirement age in the tax year who has earned the maximum earnings creditable under social security for the years used in the computation of his benefits, and whose spouse has no social security benefits except those payable on his record of earnings.

In the case of a taxpayer who is not married, an amount equal to maximum social security benefits payable for the tax year to a person attaining full retirement age in the tax year who has earned the maximum earnings creditable under social security for the years used in the computation of his benefits.

In the case of an unremarried widow or widower, an amount equal to the maximum social security benefits payable for the tax year to a widow or widower attaining full retirement age in the tax year who has no social security benefits except those to which he or she is entitled on his or her deceased spouse’s record and whose spouse had received no reduced retirement benefits prior to his or her death and whose spouse had earned the maximum earnings creditable under social security for the years used in the computation of his or her benefits under social security.

Maximum retirement benefits shall, in every case, take into consideration and be adjusted to reflect adjustments that would be made to such amounts had they been received as social security benefits as the result of the receipt of earnings in excess of earnings limitations. The terms in this paragraph are those defined in the social security act.

Taxpayers not described in paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4) of this subsection may not deduct any amount of retirement benefits under this section. This includes retirement benefits paid by the federal employees retirement system or foreign service pension system.

The total deduction under this section may not exceed the total amount of retirement benefits or annuities which are described in subsection (a) of this section and which are included in the taxpayer’s gross income in the tax year. If the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s spouse receives retirement benefits under the federal railroad retirement act or the federal social security act in the tax year, then the amount of any retirement annuities computed under subsection (b) of this section shall be reduced by the amount of such federal railroad retirement act and federal social security act retirement benefits received by either the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s spouse, and the lesser of the amount so computed or the total amount of retirement benefits or annuities which are described in subsection (a) of this section and which are included in the taxpayer’s gross income shall constitute the allowable deduction. Furthermore, the allowable deduction as calculated under this section may be subject to additional limitations under section 63-3026A(6), Idaho Code, and the rules promulgated thereunder.

As used in this section, the word “disabled” shall mean an individual who is a disabled person described in section 63-701, Idaho Code, or an individual who qualifies as a person with a “permanent disability” under section 49-117(7)(b)(iv), Idaho Code.

§ 63-3022B. Deduction for energy efficiency upgrades.

An individual taxpayer may deduct from taxable income an amount actually paid or accrued by the individual taxpayer during the taxable year for the actual installation of energy efficiency upgrade measures within any existing residence. As used in this section, “existing residence” means any residence in the state of Idaho that serves as the primary place of residence of the individual taxpayer in being, under construction, or subject to an outstanding legal building permit on or before January 1, 2002.

As used in this section:

“Energy efficiency upgrade measure” means an energy efficiency improvement to the building envelope or duct system that meets or exceeds the minimum value for the improved component established by the version of the international energy conservation code (IECC) in effect in Idaho during the taxable year in which the improvement is made or accrued.

“Energy efficiency upgrade measure” includes:

Insulation that shall be added to existing insulation not in replacement of existing insulation;

Windows that may replace less efficient existing windows;

Storm windows;

Weather stripping and caulking; and

Duct sealing and insulation. Duct sealing requires mechanical fastening of joints and mastic sealant.

§ 63-3022C. Deduction for alternative energy device at residence.

An individual taxpayer who installs an alternative energy device to serve a place of residence of the individual taxpayer in the state of Idaho may deduct from taxable income the following amounts actually paid or accrued by the individual taxpayer: forty percent (40%) of the amount that is properly attributable to the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, installation or acquisition of the alternative energy device in the year when such device is completed or acquired and is placed in service by the taxpayer; and twenty percent (20%) per year thereafter for a period of three (3) succeeding years; provided, however, that said deduction shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) taxable year.

An individual taxpayer who purchases a residence in the state of Idaho served by an alternative energy device for which none or less than all of the total deduction allowable under this section has been taken, may take the deduction specified in this section, or the unused balance of the deduction.

As used in this section, “alternative energy device” means any system or mechanism or series of mechanisms using solar radiation, wind or geothermal resource as defined in section 42-4002, Idaho Code, primarily to provide heating, to provide cooling, to produce electrical power, or any combination thereof. Alternative energy device includes a fluid to air heat pump operating on a fluid reservoir heated by solar radiation or geothermal resource. Alternative energy device shall also include either a natural gas heating unit, or a propane heating unit, or a wood burning stove which meets the most current environmental protection agency certification, or a pellet stove which meets the most current industry and state standards, and which natural gas heating unit, or propane heating unit, or wood burning stove which meets the most current environmental protection agency certification, or pellet stove which meets the most current industry and state standards is used to replace during the same tax year a wood burning stove designed for residential heating and that does not meet environmental protection agency requirements for certification, provided the wood burning stove is surrendered to the department of environmental quality or its agent for destruction in accordance with applicable federal and state rules.

§ 63-3022D. Deduction of expenses for household and dependent care services.

Allowance of Deduction. In the case of an individual who maintains a household which includes as a member one (1) or more qualifying individuals (as defined in section 21(b)(1), Internal Revenue Code), there shall be allowed as a deduction the employment-related expenses (as defined in section 21(b)(2), Internal Revenue Code, and as further specified and limited by section 21(c), (d), and (e), Internal Revenue Code) paid by such individual during the taxable year.

§ 63-3022E. Household deduction for dependents sixty-five years of age or older or persons with developmental disabilities.

An additional deduction from taxable income shall be allowed in the case of an individual who maintains a household, which includes as an immediate member of the family residing in that household, one (1) or more individuals sixty-five (65) years of age or older, or a person with developmental disabilities as defined in subsection (5) of section 66-402, Idaho Code, regardless of the age of the person when such developmental disability appeared, each of whom receives more than one-half (1/2) of his or her support for the year from the individual who maintains the household. The amount of the deduction shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each individual sixty-five (65) years of age or older or with developmental disabilities.

There shall not be allowed more than three (3) deductions of one thousand dollars ($1,000) under the provisions of this section on any one (1) return.

No deductions shall be allowed under this section for the person(s) in whose name(s) the income tax return is filed except as set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

A deduction of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be allowed under this section for a person with a developmental disability, as defined in subsection (5) of section 66-402, Idaho Code, who is filing his own return.

§ 63-3022F. Computation of tax where taxpayer restores substantial amount held under the claim of right.

In the case of a taxpayer who is entitled to a reduction in federal tax due to the restoration of an item of gross income under section 1341 of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to the computation of tax where the taxpayer restores a substantial amount held under claim of right), there shall be allowed a deduction in determining Idaho taxable income as provided in section 1341(a) (4) of the Internal Revenue Code, if not otherwise deducted by the taxpayer for Idaho income tax purposes. In computing the deduction allowable under this section, no deduction shall be allowed if the item of gross income for a prior taxable year was not included in Idaho taxable income. If the taxpayer has claimed a credit for claim of right income repayment adjustment under section 63-3029F, Idaho Code, then there shall be added to federal taxable income any amount taken as a deduction under section 1341 of the Internal Revenue Code in computing federal taxable income for the tax year.

§ 63-3022G. Moneys paid to Japanese-Americans for reparations for World War II displacement.

Amounts paid to eligible individuals shall not be included as Idaho taxable income if the payment was made from the United States civil liberties public education fund which is created by public law 100-383 (102 Stat. 905).

As used in this section, the term “eligible individual” means any living individual of Japanese ancestry who, during the evacuation, relocation and internment period was a United States citizen or a permanent resident alien, and who was confined, held in custody, relocated or otherwise deprived of liberty or property as a result of:

Executive order number 9066 dated February 19, 1942;

The act entitled “An act to provide a penalty for violation of restrictions or orders with respect to persons entering, remaining in, leaving or committing any act in military areas or zones” approved March 21, 1942 (56 Stat. 173); or

Any other executive order, presidential proclamation, law of the United States, directive of the armed forces of the United States or other action made by or on behalf of the United States or its agents, representatives, officers or employees respecting the evacuation, relocation or internment of individuals solely on the basis of Japanese ancestry.

As used in this section, the term “evacuation, relocation and internment period” means that period beginning on December 7, 1941, and ending on June 30, 1946.

As used in this section the term “permanent resident alien” means an alien lawfully admitted into the United States for permanent residence.